Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 4. Honor Scholarships

§ 2851.
Establishment.

Vermont Honor Scholarships are hereby established for secondary school seniors who plan to attend an approved postsecondary education institution.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 6(a); amended

1999, No. 24

, § 2, eff. May 19, 1999;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 2852.
Eligibility.

All resident, qualified secondary school seniors are eligible to be nominated by their secondary school for a Vermont Honor Scholarship.

Vermont Honor Scholarships shall be awarded on the basis of merit as demonstrated by scholastic excellence and participation in extracurricular and community service activities to be determined by such criteria as the Board shall prescribe.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 6(b), (c); amended

1999, No. 24

, § 3, eff. May 19, 1999;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 2853.
Application.

A qualified student may be awarded an Honor Scholarship without affecting eligibility for an incentive grant. The Honor Scholarship amount shall not be considered in determining the calculation of the initial amount of the grant, unless the student’s total grant and scholarship assistance from all sources exceeds the cost of attendance as defined under the Higher Education Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 6(f); amended

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 2854.
Amount; number; disbursement.

Each Vermont Honor Scholarship shall be an equal amount and no less than $1,000.00 as determined by the Board.

Each secondary school, or a border school serving Vermont secondary school students, may nominate a senior for a Vermont Honor Scholarship.

The Scholarship shall be disbursed to the approved postsecondary education institution at which the recipient enrolls.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 198

, § 6(d), (e); amended

1999, No. 24

, § 4, eff. May 19, 1999;

2003, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.